morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
! analyzer.lexc
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!





   




   





   




   



   




   




   




   



   



   



   




   



   


   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   





   





   




   





   


Multichar_Symbols ^A ^I ^K ^C ^c ^p ^k ^D ^t ^g ^G
                  ^(A) ^(I) ^(s) ^(n) ^(y) ^(ş)
                  ^pA ^pI ^pO ^pU ^pÂ ^pÔ ^pÛ ^pÎ
                  @RB @MB @dB
                  @APOS @ABBR
                  @M @MREDUP
                  @tSep @dSep
                  @RomNum
                  @NCOMP
                  @PRN
                  @DEL@ @DUP@ @DELS@
                  @LN @LN2 @CAUS
                  @miSPC @opt3
                  ^NS ^NNS ^S
                  ^sFUV ^sFRV ^sBUV ^sBRV ^sVC ^sUC
!                   e,i   ü,ö   a,ı   o,u   


LEXICON Number
    NumberAlpha;
    NumberNumeric;
    NumberRoman;
    NumDateTime;
    NumFraction;

LEXICON NumberAlpha
    n0;
    n0;
    n1;
    n10;
    n100;
    n1k;
    n1m;
    n1g;
    n1t;
    n1K;
! more ??

LEXICON n0
sıfır   NumStem;
! we also squeeze half & quarter terms here
yarım   NumStem;
buçuk   NumStem;
çeyrek  NumStem;
tek  NumStem;

LEXICON n1 ! 1 to 9
bir@dB      n1cont;
iki@dB      n1cont;
üç@dB       n1cont;
dör^t@dB   n1cont;
beş@dB      n1cont;
altı@dB     n1cont;
yedi@dB     n1cont;
sekiz@dB    n1cont;
dokuz@dB    n1cont;



LEXICON n1cont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;

LEXICON n10 ! 11 to 99
on@dB       n10cont;
yirmi@dB    n10cont;
otuz@dB     n10cont;
kırk@dB     n10cont;
elli@dB     n10cont;
altmış@dB   n10cont;
yetmiş@dB   n10cont;
seksen@dB   n10cont;
doksan@dB   n10cont;

LEXICON n10cont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;
    n1;


LEXICON n100 ! 100 to 999
    prefixN100;
    N100;

LEXICON prefixN100
iki@dB      N100;
üç@dB       N100;
dör^t@dB   N100;
beş@dB      N100;
altı@dB     N100;
yedi@dB     N100;
sekiz@dB    N100;
dokuz@dB    N100;

LEXICON N100
yüz@dB    n100cont;

LEXICON   n100cont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;
    n10;
    n1;


!--------------------

LEXICON n1k ! 1000 to 999,999
    prefixN1k;
    N1k;

LEXICON prefixN1k
    prefixN1k2;
    prefixN1k10;
    prefixN1k100;

LEXICON prefixN1k1
bir@dB      N1k2cont;
            prefixN1k2;

LEXICON prefixN1k2
iki@dB      N1k2cont;
üç@dB       N1k2cont;
dör^t@dB   N1k2cont;
beş@dB      N1k2cont;
altı@dB     N1k2cont;
yedi@dB     N1k2cont;
sekiz@dB    N1k2cont;
dokuz@dB    N1k2cont;

LEXICON N1k2cont
    N1k;

LEXICON  prefixN1k10
on@dB       N1k10cont;
yirmi@dB    N1k10cont;
otuz@dB     N1k10cont;
kırk@dB     N1k10cont;
elli@dB     N1k10cont;
altmış@dB   N1k10cont;
yetmiş@dB   N1k10cont;
seksen@dB   N1k10cont;
doksan@dB   N1k10cont;

LEXICON N1k10cont
    N1k;
    prefixN1k1;

LEXICON  prefixN1k100
        N1k100pre;
        N1k100;

LEXICON   N1k100pre
iki@dB      N1k100preCont;
üç@dB       N1k100preCont;
dör^t@dB   N1k100preCont;
beş@dB      N1k100preCont;
altı@dB     N1k100preCont;
yedi@dB     N1k100preCont;
sekiz@dB    N1k100preCont;
dokuz@dB    N1k100preCont;

LEXICON   N1k100preCont
        N1k100;

LEXICON N1k100
yüz@dB  N1k100Cont;

LEXICON     N1k100Cont
    N1k;
    prefixN1k10;

LEXICON N1k
bin@dB  n1kCont;

LEXICON     n1kCont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!--------------------

LEXICON n1m ! 1,000,000 to 999,999,999
    prefixN1m;
    N1mNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1m
    prefixN1m1;
    prefixN1m10;
    prefixN1m100;

LEXICON prefixN1m1
bir@dB      N1m1cont;
iki@dB      N1m1cont;
üç@dB       N1m1cont;
dör^t@dB   N1m1cont;
beş@dB      N1m1cont;
altı@dB     N1m1cont;
yedi@dB     N1m1cont;
sekiz@dB    N1m1cont;
dokuz@dB    N1m1cont;

LEXICON N1m1cont
    N1m;

LEXICON  prefixN1m10
on@dB       N1m10cont;
yirmi@dB    N1m10cont;
otuz@dB     N1m10cont;
kırk@dB     N1m10cont;
elli@dB     N1m10cont;
altmış@dB   N1m10cont;
yetmiş@dB   N1m10cont;
seksen@dB   N1m10cont;
doksan@dB   N1m10cont;

LEXICON N1m10cont
    N1m;
    prefixN1m1;

LEXICON  prefixN1m100
        N1m100pre;
        N1m100;

LEXICON   N1m100pre
iki@dB      N1m100preCont;
üç@dB       N1m100preCont;
dör^t@dB   N1m100preCont;
beş@dB      N1m100preCont;
altı@dB     N1m100preCont;
yedi@dB     N1m100preCont;
sekiz@dB    N1m100preCont;
dokuz@dB    N1m100preCont;

LEXICON   N1m100preCont
        N1m100;

LEXICON N1m100
yüz@dB  N1m100Cont;

LEXICON     N1m100Cont
    N1m;
    prefixN1m10;

LEXICON N1m
milyon@dB   n1mCont;

LEXICON N1mNoPrefix
milyon@dB   NumStem;

LEXICON     n1mCont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!------------------

LEXICON n1g ! 1,000,000,000 to 999,999,999,999
    prefixN1g;
    N1gNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1g
    prefixN1g1;
    prefixN1g10;
    prefixN1g100;

LEXICON prefixN1g1
bir@dB      N1g1cont;
iki@dB      N1g1cont;
üç@dB       N1g1cont;
dör^t@dB    N1g1cont;
beş@dB      N1g1cont;
altı@dB     N1g1cont;
yedi@dB     N1g1cont;
sekiz@dB    N1g1cont;
dokuz@dB    N1g1cont;

LEXICON N1g1cont
    N1g;

LEXICON  prefixN1g10
on@dB       N1g10cont;
yirmi@dB    N1g10cont;
otuz@dB     N1g10cont;
kırk@dB     N1g10cont;
elli@dB     N1g10cont;
altmış@dB   N1g10cont;
yetmiş@dB   N1g10cont;
seksen@dB   N1g10cont;
doksan@dB   N1g10cont;

LEXICON N1g10cont
    N1g;
    prefixN1g1;

LEXICON  prefixN1g100
        N1g100pre;
        N1g100;

LEXICON   N1g100pre
iki@dB      N1g100preCont;
üç@dB       N1g100preCont;
dör^t@dB   N1g100preCont;
beş@dB      N1g100preCont;
altı@dB     N1g100preCont;
yedi@dB     N1g100preCont;
sekiz@dB    N1g100preCont;
dokuz@dB    N1g100preCont;

LEXICON   N1g100preCont
        N1g100;

LEXICON N1g100
yüz@dB  N1g100Cont;

LEXICON     N1g100Cont
    N1g;
    prefixN1g10;

LEXICON N1g
milyar@dB   n1gCont;

LEXICON N1gNoPrefix
milyar@dB   NumStem;

LEXICON     n1gCont
    NumStem;
    NumHalf;
    n1m;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!------------------

LEXICON n1t ! 1,000,000,000 to 999,999,999,999
    prefixN1t;
    N1tNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1t
    prefixN1t1;
    prefixN1t10;
    prefixN1t100;

LEXICON prefixN1t1
bir@dB      N1t1cont;
iki@dB      N1t1cont;
üç@dB       N1t1cont;
dör^t@dB   N1t1cont;
beş@dB      N1t1cont;
altı@dB     N1t1cont;
yedi@dB     N1t1cont;
sekiz@dB    N1t1cont;
dokuz@dB    N1t1cont;

LEXICON N1t1cont
    N1t;

LEXICON  prefixN1t10
on@dB       N1t10cont;
yirmi@dB    N1t10cont;
otuz@dB     N1t10cont;
kırk@dB     N1t10cont;
elli@dB     N1t10cont;
altmış@dB   N1t10cont;
yetmiş@dB   N1t10cont;
seksen@dB   N1t10cont;
doksan@dB   N1t10cont;

LEXICON N1t10cont
    N1t;
    prefixN1t1;

LEXICON  prefixN1t100
        N1t100pre;
        N1t100;

LEXICON   N1t100pre
iki@dB      N1t100preCont;
üç@dB       N1t100preCont;
dör^t@dB   N1t100preCont;
beş@dB      N1t100preCont;
altı@dB     N1t100preCont;
yedi@dB     N1t100preCont;
sekiz@dB    N1t100preCont;
dokuz@dB    N1t100preCont;

LEXICON   N1t100preCont
        N1t100;

LEXICON N1t100
yüz@dB  N1t100Cont;

LEXICON Root
Number; ! numbers are special as they are defined through a set of rules.
